Utah statutes.
48-2c-1609.   Amendment of articles of organization of foreign company.

Whenever the articles of organization of a foreign company authorized to transact business in this state are amended, it shall not be necessary for the foreign company to file a copy of the amendments with the division; but amending the articles of organization shall not of itself enlarge or alter the purpose or purposes which the foreign company is authorized to pursue in transacting its business in this state, nor authorize the foreign company to transact business in this state under any other name than the name set forth in its application for authority filed with the division.

